Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.20.070

Application of reporting requirements in small political subdivisions. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (7) of this section, the reporting provisions of this title do not apply to:

(a) Candidates, elected officials, and agencies in political subdivisions with fewer than 2,000 registered voters as of the date of the most recent general election in the jurisdiction;

(b) Political committees formed to support or oppose candidates or ballot propositions in such political subdivisions; or

(c) Persons making independent expenditures in support of or opposition to such ballot propositions.

(2) The reporting provisions of this title apply in any exempt political subdivision from which a "petition for disclosure" containing the valid signatures of 15 percent of the number of registered voters, as of the date of the most recent general election in the political subdivision, is filed with the commission. The commission shall by rule prescribe the form of the petition. After the signatures are gathered, the petition shall be presented to the auditor or elections officer of the county, or counties, in which the political subdivision is located. The auditor or elections officer shall verify the signatures and certify to the commission that the petition contains no less than the required number of valid signatures. The commission, upon receipt of a valid petition, shall order every known affected person in the political subdivision to file the initially required statement and reports within 14 days of the date of the order.

(3) The reporting provisions of this title apply in any exempt political subdivision that by ordinance, resolution, or other official action has petitioned the commission to make the provisions applicable to elected officials and candidates of the exempt political subdivision. A copy of the action shall be sent to the commission. If the commission finds the petition to be a valid action of the appropriate governing body or authority, the commission shall order every known affected person in the political subdivision to file the initially required statement and reports within 14 days of the date of the order.

(4) The commission shall void any order issued by it pursuant to subsection (2) or (3) of this section when, at least four years after issuing the order, the commission is presented a petition or official action so requesting from the affected political subdivision. Such petition or official action shall meet the respective requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section.

(5) Any petition for disclosure, ordinance, resolution, or official action of an agency petitioning the commission to void the exemption in RCW 29B.25.010(3) shall not be considered unless it has been filed with the commission:

(a) In the case of a ballot proposition, at least 60 days before the date of any election in which campaign finance reporting is to be required;

(b) In the case of a candidate, at least 60 days before the first day on which a person may file a declaration of candidacy for any election in which campaign finance reporting is to be required.

(6) Any person exempted from reporting under this title may at the person's option file the statement and reports.

(7) The reporting provisions of this title apply to a candidate in any political subdivision if the candidate receives or expects to receive five thousand dollars or more in contributions.

[ 2024 c 164 s 413; 2019 c 428 s 12; 2010 c 204 s 307; 2006 c 240 s 2; 1986 c 12 s 3; 1985 c 367 s 13; 1982 c 60 s 1. Formerly RCW 42.17A.135, 42.17.405.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 428: See notes following RCW 29B.20.110.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.